enginject.lexc
!!!enginject.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Inject

LEXICON Root

Interjection ;

LEXICON Interjection

Alright Iinf;
Cheers Iinf;
O Iinf;
OK Iinf;
Shucks Iinf;
ah Iinf;
aha Iinf;
ahem Iinf;
ahoy Iinf;
alack Iinf;
alas Iinf;
atishoo Iinf;
attaboy Iinf;
avast Iinf;
avaunt Iinf;
bah Iinf;
begad Iinf;
begorra Iinf;
blimey Iinf;
bo Iinf;
boh Iinf;
bye-bye Iinf;
cheerio Iinf;
crikey Iinf;
cripes Iinf;
eh Iinf;
eureka Iinf;
faugh Iinf;
fiddle-sticks Iinf;
fie Iinf;
gee-up Iinf;
gosh Iinf;
ha Iinf;
heighho Iinf;
hello Iinf;
hey Iinf;
hi Iinf;
ho Iinf;
holloa Iinf;
huh Iinf;
hullo Iinf;
humph Iinf;
hurray Iinf;
jiminy Iinf;
lo Iinf;
lor Iinf;
lumme Iinf;
lummy Iinf;
nope Iinf;
oh Iinf;
oho Iinf;
pah Iinf;
phew Iinf;
phooey Iinf;
pooh Iinf;
prithee Iinf;
pshaw Iinf;
rah Iinf;
roger Iinf;
shalom Iinf;
strewth Iinf;
struth Iinf;
ta Iinf;
ugh Iinf;
whew Iinf;
whoa Iinf;
wotcher Iinf;
yah Iinf;
yea Iinf;
yes Iinf;
yippee Iinf;
yo-heave-ho Iinf;

LEXICON Iinf

[stem]+Inject:0 #;
